Connecticut, session 2026, SB00464.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a task force
2 to study the compensation of registrars of voters, town clerks, persons
3 appointed by registrars of voters or town clerks and any other local
4 election officials during the early voting periods at elections, primaries
5 and referenda and on the days of such elections, primaries and
6 referenda.
7 (b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
8 (1) One appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;
9 (2) One appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate;
10 (3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
11 Representatives;
SB464 / File No. 571 1

SB464 File No. 571
12 (4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
13 (5) Two appointed by the minority leader of the House of
14 Representatives; and
15 (6) Two appointed by the minority leader of the Senate.
16 (c) Any member of the task force may be a member of the General
17 Assembly.
18 (d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
19 than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall
20 be filled by the appointing authority.
21 (e) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro
22 tempore of the Senate shall select the chairpersons of the task force from
23 among the members of the task force. Such chairpersons shall schedule
24 the first meeting of the task force, which shall be held not later than sixty
25 days after the effective date of this section.
26 (f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
27 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to elections
28 shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
29 (g) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
30 on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of
31 the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
32 elections, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
33 general statutes. The task force shall terminate on the date that it
34 submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
GAE Joint Favorable
SB464 / File No. 571 2

SB464 File No. 571
SB464 / File No. 571 3

SB464 File No. 571
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill establishes a task force to study the compensation of election
workers during the early voting period, resulting in no fiscal impact to
the state or municipalities. It is anticipated that the task force members
will have sufficient expertise to meet the requirements of the bill.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB464 / File No. 571 4

SB464 File No. 571
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 464
AN ACT STUDYING COMPENSATION OF ELECTION WORKERS
DURING THE EARLY VOTING PERIODS PRECEDING AND ON THE
DAY OF ELECTIONS, PRIMARIES AND REFERENDA.